Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-132] Unlawful detention of another.
Any person subject to this chapter who, except as provided by law or rule,
apprehends, arrests, or confines any person shall be punished as a
court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next